Maryland, session 2025, SB0284.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
12–102.
This title applies only in Baltimore City.
12–2007.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, a licensed premises shall
end all operations, including the serving of alcoholic beverages and food and providing
entertainment, at the closing hour for that class of licensed premises specified in this title.
(b) (1) The Board may grant an exemption for remaining open after hours to:
(i) a holder of a Class B restaurant license, only for serving food to
patrons seated for dining;
(ii) a pharmacy that fills prescriptions; or
– 1 –

Ch. 826 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iii) a holder of a Class D beer, wine, and liquor license that operates
a restaurant, if:
1. it is used only for serving food to patrons seated in a dining
room that is not adjacent to a bar; and
2. the restaurant is located in the 46th legislative district in
the Legislative Districting Plan of 2022.
(2) A pharmacy that receives an exemption under paragraph (1) of this
subsection may also sell products other than alcohol after normal closing hours.
(3) A hotel that holds a Class B license and that serves food to seated
customers or for private functions or guest rooms may continue to provide food service.
(4) The Board may waive the requirement in paragraph (1)(iii)1 of this
subsection that a dining room not be adjacent to a bar.
12–2802.
(F) FOR THE OFFENSE BY A HOLDER OF AN ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES
LICENSE OF OPERATING THE LICENSED PREMISES OUTSIDE THE HOURS OF
OPERATION SPECIFIED IN THIS TITLE WITHOUT FIRST OBTAINING AN EXEMPTION
UNDER § 12–2007 OF THIS TITLE, THE BOARD SHALL:
(1) FOR A FIRST OFFENSE, IMPOSE A FINE OF NOT LESS THAN $1,000
OR SUSPEND THE LICENSE OR BOTH; AND
(2) FOR A SECOND OR SUBSEQUENT OFFENSE, IMPOSE A FINE OF NOT
LESS THAN $2,000 AND NOT MORE THAN $20,000 OR SUSPEND THE LICENSE OR
BOTH.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 2 –